Illinois, session 104th, SB3728.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-631 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-631 new)8    Sec. 2705-631. Airport project reports. The Secretary of 9Transportation shall report to the President of the Senate, 10the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 11Representatives, the Minority Leader of the House of 12Representatives, the Chairperson and Minority Spokesperson of 13the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriation 14Committees with jurisdiction over Department appropriations, 15and the Director of the Governor's Office of Management and 16Budget as of December 31 of each year the following:17        (1) By project, the amount of local airport planning 18    and design engineering approved for reimbursement by the 19    Department through programming letters for which the 20    Department has not executed a binding agreement to 21    reimburse such work from either federal or State funds, 22    including:23            (A) The date of approval for the local airport   SB3728- 2 -LRB104 18285 LNS 31725 b1        sponsor to incur reimbursable planning and design 2        engineering costs.3            (B) The reason the Department has not executed a 4        binding agreement with the airport sponsor to 5        reimburse the Department approved planning and 6        engineering costs as they are incurred as the 7        Department does with local governments implementing 8        Department assisted highway, transit, and rail 9        projects.10        (2) By project, the amount of airport construction 11    bids opened by the Department for which there is no 12    binding funding agreement executed with the local airport 13    sponsor to provide the local airport construction share as 14    the Department requires for local government highway 15    projects prior to advertisement for letting.16        (3) By project, the amount of construction contract 17    bids opened but not awarded by the Department within 45 18    days, including an explanation of the reason the contract 19    was not awarded in a timely fashion.20        (4) The amount and date of submittal for invoices 21    submitted to the Department by local airport sponsors for 22    airport planning and design engineering services that were 23    not paid by the Department within 30 days of the date of 24    local airport sponsor invoice submittal, including an 25    explanation of the reason for each invoice not being paid 26    within 30 days of submittal.  SB3728- 3 -LRB104 18285 LNS 31725 b1    The Department shall file this report with the designated 2persons, committees, and offices by January 31 of each year or 32 weeks prior to a scheduled appropriation hearing for the 4upcoming fiscal year, whichever date is earlier.